Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-3-106 of Title 10A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Office of Juvenile Affairs shall not charge any amount or


assess any fee to place a phone call from within a juvenile


detention facility operated by the Office of Juvenile Affairs.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 569.1 of Title 57, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Department of Corrections shall not charge any amount or


assess any fee to place a phone call from within a facility operated


by the Department of Corrections.

Req. No. 2651 Page 1


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2651 CN 12/22/2025 1:40:28 PM











































Req. No. 2651 Page 2